Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1124
Service agency, defined.

Service agency means the school district, educational service unit, local or regional office of intellectual disability, interim-program school, or some combination thereof or such other agency as may provide a special education program approved by the State Department of Education, including an institution not wholly owned or controlled by the state or any political subdivision to the extent that it provides educational or other services for the benefit of a child with a disability if such services are nonsectarian in nature.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3313;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 806;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 14;

Laws 2010, LB1087, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 46;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 20.